District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.11

Continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify spousal-support order.

(a)

A tribunal of the District issuing a spousal-support order consistent with the law of the District has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction to modify the spousal-support order throughout the existence of the support obligation.

(b)

A tribunal of the District may not modify a spousal-support order issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over that order under the law of that state or foreign country.

(c)

A tribunal of the District that has continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over a spousal-support order, may serve as:

(1)

An initiating tribunal to request a tribunal of another state to enforce the spousal-support order issued in the District; or

(2)

A responding tribunal to enforce or modify its own spousal-support order.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 211, 63 DCR 222

History